Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.620

Hindering or bribing voter.

Any person who uses menace, force, threat, or any unlawful means towards any voter to hinder or deter such a voter from voting, or directly or indirectly offers any bribe, reward, or any thing of value to a voter in exchange for the voter's vote for or against any person or ballot measure, or authorizes any person to do so, is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2128. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 5; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.060; prior: (i) 1911 c 89 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 904; 1873 p 204 s 103; 1854 p 93 s 94; RRS s 5386. (ii) 1911 c 89 s 1, part; 1901 c 142 s 1; Code 1881 s 909; 1873 p 205 s 106; 1865 p 50 s 1; 1854 p 93 s 97; RRS s 5388. Formerly RCW 29.85.060.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.